District of Columbia statutes.
22-3312.01

Defacing public or private property.

It shall be unlawful for any person or persons willfully and wantonly to disfigure, cut, chip, or cover, rub with, or otherwise place filth or excrement of any kind; to write, mark, or print obscene or indecent figures representing obscene or objects upon; to write, mark, draw, or paint, without the consent of the owner or proprietor thereof, or, in the case of public property, of the person having charge, custody, or control thereof, any word, sign, or figure upon:

(1)

Any property, public or private, building, statue, monument, office, public passenger vehicle, mass transit equipment or facility, dwelling or structure of any kind including those in the course of erection; or

(2)

The doors, windows, steps, railing, fencing, balconies, balustrades, stairs, porches, halls, walls, sides of any enclosure thereof, or any movable property.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-203, § 2, 30 DCR 180
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 7, 44 DCR 1408
Wastewater system, tampering with and misuse, see § 8-105.05.
This section is referenced in § 22-3312.04, § 22-3312.05, and § 23-581.
1981 Ed., § 22-3112.1.